Wyoming, session 2025, HB0216.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-1011 is created to read:

6-3-1011. Authorized euthanasia practices.

(a) No animal control facility shall euthanize a pet
by using any method other than euthanasia by injection
utilizing a commercially available euthanasia solution sold
HB0216

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0367
for the purpose of euthanizing pets as provided by this
section. For purposes of this section, the euthanasia
solution shall be administered by:

(i) Intravenous injection by hypodermic needle;

(ii) Intraperitoneal injection by hypodermic
needle; or

(iii) Intracardiac injection by hypodermic
needle, only if an animal is first unconscious.

(b) If an animal control facility euthanizes pets,
the animal control facility shall:

(i) Adopt a policy for euthanasia that complies
with the applicable provisions of this section;

(ii) Adopt a policy requiring persons who
perform or assist with euthanasia by injection to attend a
training program upon initial certification and at least
one (1) time every two (2) years thereafter; and

HB0216

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0367
(iii) Keep a record of training dates and all
attendees.

(c) The requirements imposed on animal control
facilities by subsection (b) of this section are in
addition to the requirements imposed on animal euthanasia
technicians in W.S. 33-30-223 and 33-30-224.

Section 2. W.S. 6-3-1001(a)(ii) and by creating new
paragraphs (iv) and (v), 6-3-1003 by creating a new
subsection (d), 6-3-1004(a) and (b)(ii) and 6-3-1008(a)(i)
are amended to read:

6-3-1001. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(ii) "Household pet" means any privately owned
dog, cat, rabbit, guinea pig, hamster, mouse, gerbil,
ferret, bird, fish, reptile, amphibian, invertebrate or any
other species of domesticated animal sold, transferred or
retained for the purpose of being kept as a pet providing
companionship or other nonutility function in or near a
HB0216

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0367
house human dwelling unit. "Household pet" shall not
include any livestock;

(iv) "Animal control facility" means a public or
private facility whose primary purpose is to provide
temporary care for stray, surrendered or neglected
household pets;

(v) "Pet" means any dog, cat, rabbit, guinea
pig, hamster, mouse, gerbil, ferret, bird, fish, reptile,
amphibian, invertebrate or any other species of
domesticated animal sold, transferred or retained for the
purpose of providing companionship or other nonutility
function in or near a human dwelling unit. "Pet" shall not
include any livestock.

6-3-1003. Other misdemeanors involving animal abuse;
prohibition on manner of destruction of animals; attending
fowl or dog fights; keeping household pets in unsanitary
conditions.

(d) An animal control facility shall not destroy an
animal by the use of a high-altitude decompression chamber,
HB0216

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0367
carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide or any nonanesthetic
inhalant.

6-3-1004. Penalties, misdemeanor offenses.

(a) A first offense of cruelty to animals or of a
violation of W.S. 6-3-1003 or 6-3-1011 is a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both.

(b) A second or subsequent conviction, resulting from
charges separately brought and arising out of separate
occurrences within a five (5) year period:

(ii) Under W.S. 6-3-1003 or 6-3-1011 is a
misdemeanor offense punishable by imprisonment for not more
than six (6) months, a fine of not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

6-3-1008. Use of agricultural and livestock
management practices, wildlife management and humane
destruction not prohibited.
HB0216

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0367

(a) Nothing in this article may be construed to
prohibit:

(i) Except as otherwise provided by W.S.
6-3-1011(a), a person humanely destroying an animal,
including livestock;

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0216